Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2481.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 12 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended to read:Section 12. Employment of minors in student-learner and apprenticeship programs.(a) Employment in program.--A minor may be employed in a work experience and career exploration program, an apprenticeship program and a school-to-work program to the extent permitted by regulations promulgated under this act and not prohibited by the Fair Labor Standards Act.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) Employment after graduation and program completion.--A minor who is a high school graduate may be employed in an occupation for which the minor has completed a work experience and career exploration program, an apprenticeship program or a school-to-work program to the extent that the employment is not prohibited by the Fair Labor Standards Act.Section 2. The provisions of 34 Pa. Code Ch. 11 are abrogated to the extent that they are inconsistent with the addition of section 12(b) of the act.Section 3. The following shall apply:(1) No later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph, the Department of Labor and Industry shall propose regulations to replace 34 Pa. Code Ch. 11 in accordance with section 5 of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The provisions of 34 Pa. Code Ch. 11 are abrogated upon the earlier of the following:(i) The promulgation of the final-form regulations under paragraph (1) in accordance with the Regulatory Review Act.(ii) Three years after the effective date of this subparagraph.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2481PN3339 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223